Maryland, session 2026, HB0148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM” MEANS A SYSTEM,
SOFTWARE, OR A PROCESS THAT USES COMPUTATION TO ASSIST, APPROXIMATE, OR
REPLACE HUMAN DECISION MAKING.

HOUSE BILL 148 3
(II) “AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM” INCLUDES A SYSTEM,
SOFTWARE, OR A PROCESS DERIVED FROM MACHINE LEARNING, STATISTICS, OR
OTHER DATA PROCESSING OR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TECHNIQUES.
(III) “AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM” DOES NOT INCLUDE
PASSIVE COMPUTING INFRASTRUCTURE.
(4) “SURVEILLANCE–BASED PRICE SETTING” MEANS THE USE OF
SURVEILLANCE DATA IN CONJUNCTION WITH AN AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM TO
OFFER OR INFORM A CUSTOMIZED PRICE FOR A GOOD OR SERVICE FOR A SPECIFIC
INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP OF INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE.
(5) (I) “SURVEILLANCE DATA” MEANS DATA OBTAINED THROUGH
OBSERVATION, INFERENCE, OR SURVEILLANCE OF AN INDIVIDUAL RELATING TO
PERSONAL OR GENETIC INFORMATION, BEHAVIOR, OR BIOMETRICS OF THE
INDIVIDUAL OR A GROUP, BAND, CLASS, OR TIER TO WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL
BELONGS.
(II) “SURVEILLANCE DATA” INCLUDES DATA GATHERED,
PURCHASED, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRED.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON THAT OFFERS A
CUSTOMIZED PRICE TO A CONSUMER OR GROUP OF CONSUMERS WHEN THE
DIFFERENT PRICES:
(1) ARE BASED ON DIFFERENCES IN COST TO PROVIDE A GOOD OR
SERVICE TO DIFFERENT CONSUMERS; OR
(2) REFLECT A DISCOUNT OR REWARD OFFERED TO ALL CONSUMERS
ON EQUAL TERMS IN WHICH:
(I) THE TERMS OF THE DISCOUNT OR REWARD ARE AVAILABLE
AND ACCESSIBLE TO EACH CONSUMER;
(II) THE DISCOUNT OR REWARD IS OFFERED UNIFORMLY TO
EACH CONSUMER WHO MEETS THE DISCLOSED ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA, SUCH AS
STATUS AS A SENIOR, STUDENT, TEACHER, VETERAN, OR MEMBER OF THE MILITARY;
AND
(III) ELIGIBILITY FOR THE DISCOUNT OR REWARD IS BASED ON
INFORMATION AFFIRMATIVELY AND VOLUNTARILY PROVIDED BY THE CONSUMER
TO THE PERSON OFFERING THE DISCOUNT OR REWARD.

HOUSE BILL 148
(C) ANY SURVEILLANCE DATA USED TO OFFER A CUSTOMIZED PRICE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE USED FOR ANY
OTHER PURPOSE, INCLUDING PROFILING, TARGETED ADVERTISING, OR THE
SETTING OF A PRICE IN ANY OTHER MANNER NOT CONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN SURVEILLANCE–BASED PRICE SETTING.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–103.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commissioner may conduct
an investigation to determine whether a provision of this title has been violated on the
Commissioner’s own initiative or may require a written complaint.
(e) (7) THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE WHETHER § 3–718 OF
THIS TITLE HAS BEEN VIOLATED ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT OF AN
EMPLOYEE.
3–718.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
14–1330 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(3) “SURVEILLANCE–BASED WAGE SETTING” MEANS THE USE OF
SURVEILLANCE DATA IN CONJUNCTION WITH AN AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM TO
OFFER OR INFORM A CUSTOMIZED WAGE FOR A SPECIFIC EMPLOYEE OR GROUP OF
EMPLOYEES IN THE STATE.
(4) “SURVEILLANCE DATA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–1330
OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN EMPLOYER WHO:
(1) OFFERS A CUSTOMIZED WAGE BASED ON DATA SPECIFIC TO AN
EMPLOYEE THAT IS:
(I) DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE TASK THE EMPLOYEE WAS
HIRED TO PERFORM; OR

HOUSE BILL 148 5
(II) BASED ON THE LOCATION WHERE THE EMPLOYEE WORKS
AND THE COST OF LIVING IN THAT LOCATION; AND
(2) BEFORE HIRING AN EMPLOYEE WHOSE WAGES ARE SET IN WHOLE
OR IN PART THROUGH AN AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM, DISCLOSES IN PLAIN
LANGUAGE TO THE EMPLOYEE WHAT DATA IS CONSIDERED AND HOW THE
AUTOMATED DECISION SYSTEM CONSIDERS THE DATA.
(C) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT ENGAGE IN SURVEILLANCE–BASED WAGE
SETTING.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT DIMINISH THE RIGHT OF COVERED
EMPLOYEES TO COLLECTIVELY BARGAIN OVER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT IN EXCESS OF THE PROTECTIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) (1) WHENEVER THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THIS
SECTION HAS BEEN VIOLATED, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) TRY TO RESOLVE ANY ISSUE INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION
INFORMALLY BY MEDIATION; OR
(II) ASK THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO BRING AN ACTION ON
BEHALF OF THE APPLICANT OR EMPLOYEE.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE VIOLATION ALLEGEDLY OCCURRED FOR
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, DAMAGES, OR OTHER RELIEF.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Artificial intelligence” means a machine–based system that:
(1) can, for a given set of human–defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2) uses machine and human–based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments and abstracts those perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner; and
(3) uses model inference to formulate options for information or action.

HOUSE BILL 148
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.